Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1202
Legislative findings.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:

(1) The National Collegiate Athletic Association is a national unincorporated association consisting of public and private colleges and universities and is a private monopolist that controls intercollegiate athletics throughout the United States;

(2) The National Collegiate Athletic Association adopts rules governing member institutions' admissions, academic eligibility, and financial aid standards for collegiate athletes;

(3) A member must agree contractually to administer its athletic program in accordance with National Collegiate Athletic Association legislation;

(4) National Collegiate Athletic Association rules provide that association enforcement procedures are an essential part of the intercollegiate athletic program of each member institution;

(5) The National Collegiate Athletic Association exercises great power over member institutions by virtue of its monopolistic control of intercollegiate athletics and its power to prevent a nonconforming institution from competing in intercollegiate athletic events or contests;

(6) Substantial monetary loss, serious disruption of athletic programs, and significant damage to reputation may result from the imposition of penalties on a college or university by the National Collegiate Athletic Association for what the association determines to be a violation of its rules; and

(7) Because of such potentially serious and far reaching consequences, all proceedings which may result in the imposition of any penalty by the National Collegiate Athletic Association should be subject to the requirements of due process of law.

Laws 1990, LB 397, § 2.